Colorado, session 2026A, HB1168.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of revenue for
the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado
2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part XX as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART XX
DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
(1) EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S OFFICE
(A) Administration and Support
Personal Services 21,169,941 9,305,854 3,557,533a 8,306,554b
20,919,941 9,055,854
(202.6 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 23,958,192 10,442,285 13,413,341a 102,566b
24,551,694 10,643,029 13,803,119a 105,546b
Short-term Disability 91,492 41,189 49,935a 368b
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 584,241 264,787 317,087a 2,367b
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 12,983,142 5,884,150 7,046,382a 52,610b
Salary Survey 3,538,396 1,614,887 1,909,039a 14,470b
Step Pay 863,127 328,160 532,804a 2,163b
PERA Direct Distribution 2,358,908 1,132,328 1,226,580a
Shift Differential 194,438 194,438a
Workers' Compensation 439,608 167,660 271,948a
Operating Expenses 3,945,448 2,678,401 1,243,197a 23,850b
3,820,448 2,553,401
Postage 458,402 283,346 175,056a
Legal Services 6,167,197 3,241,209 2,925,988a
Administrative Law Judge
Services 11,373 11,373a
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 820,278 311,884 508,394a
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1168

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Vehicle Lease Payments 1,047,509 141,451 906,058a
853,472 115,256 738,216a
Leased Space 7,289,345 909,496 6,379,849a
7,164,345 784,496
Capitol Complex Leased
Space 73,921 30,915 43,006a
Payments to OIT 23,373,032 11,909,223 11,463,809a
23,070,100 11,754,879 11,315,221a
Digital Trunk Radio
Payments 138,247 138,247a
CORE Operations 199,018 75,925 123,093a
Utilities 83,703 83,703a
109,788,958
109,385,491
a Of these amounts, it is estimated that $1,157,402 shall be from the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to Section 43-4-201
(3)(a)(V), C.R.S., $1,406,357 shall be from the Marijuana Cash Fund created in Section 44-10-801 (1)(a), C.R.S., $65,046 shall be from the Electronic Transactions Fund created in
Section 42-1-234(4)(a), $1,987 shall be from the Donate to a Colorado Nonprofit Fund created in Section 39-22-5104 (1), C.R.S., $1,600 shall be from the Feeding Colorado Fund created
in Section 39-22-5303 (1), C.R.S., and $49,888,468 $49,961,816 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b Of these amounts, it is estimated that $6,858,207 $6,861,187 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section
24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S., and $1,646,741 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.
(B) Hearings Division
Personal Services 3,641,627 3,641,627a
(33.3 FTE)
Operating Expenses 110,412 110,412a
Indirect Cost Assessment 222,226 222,226a
3,974,265
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1168

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of these amounts, it is estimated that $483,851 shall be from the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., $246,228 shall be from the First Time Drunk
Driving Offender Account in the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 42-2-132 (4)(b)(II)(A), and $3,244,186 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
113,763,223
113,359,756
(2) TAXATION BUSINESS GROUP
(A) Administration
Personal Services 635,608 615,257 20,351a
(5.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 12,543 12,543
Tax Administration IT
System (GenTax) Support 7,868,539 7,748,553 119,986b
IDS Print Production 6,270,031 6,223,252 46,779c
14,786,721
a Of this amount, it is estimated that $18,720 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $1,631 shall be from the Highway Users Tax
Fund created in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to Section 43-4-201 (3)(a)(V), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $10,000 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $109,986 shall be from the Decarbonization Tax Credits
Administration Cash Fund created in Section 24-38.5-120 (2), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Colorado DRIVES Vehicle Services Account in the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 42-1-211 (2), C.R.S.
(B) Taxation Services
Personal Services 37,134,692 35,138,061 1,742,546a 254,085b
(431.3 FTE)
Operating Expenses 4,841,409 4,818,262 23,147a
Joint Audit Program 352,259 352,259
Mineral Audit Program 918,132 66,000c 852,132(I)d
(10.2 FTE)
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1168

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Document Management 5,679,805 5,677,198 2,607e
48,926,297
a Of these amounts, $1,031,135 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., $227,361 shall be from the Decarbonization Tax Credits
Administration Cash Fund created in Section 24-38.5-120 (2), C.R.S., $146,235 shall be from the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., and appropriated
pursuant to Section 43-4-201 (3)(a)(V), C.R.S., $105,339 shall be from the Donate to a Colorado Nonprofit Fund created in Section 39-22-5104 (1) C.R.S., with any unfunded amounts
offset by General Fund per SB 18-141, $6,000 shall be from the Private Letter Ruling Fund created in Section 24-35-103.5 (6), C.R.S.,$29,217 shall be from the Aviation Fund created
in Section 43-10-109 (1), C.R.S., $59,708 shall be from the Tobacco Settlement Defense Account of the Tobacco Litigation Settlement Cash Fund created in Section 24-22-115 (2)(a),
C.R.S., $51,853 shall be from Marijuana Cash Fund created in Section 44-10-801 (1)(a), C.R.S., $22,274 shall be from the Tobacco Tax Enforcement Cash Fund created in Section
39-28-107 (1)(b), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to Section 43-4-201 (3)(a)(V), and an estimated $86,571 shall be from various sources of cash funds. Expenditures from the Tobacco
Settlement Defense Account of the Tobacco Litigation Settlement Cash Fund do not constitute fiscal year spending for the purpose of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
b Of these amounts, it is estimated that $154,085 shall be from the Mineral Audit Program for programmatic indirect cost recoveries and $100,000 shall be transferred from the Hospital
Community Benefit Program in the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing per H.B. 23-1243.
c Of this amount, $65,500 shall be transferred from the State Board of Land Commissioners in the Department of Natural Resources, pursuant to Section 36-1-145 (2)(b), C.R.S., and
$500 shall be transferred from the Oil and Gas Conservation Commission in the Department of Natural Resources.
d This amount is anticipated to include $690,227 for direct expenses and $161,905 for programmatic indirect cost recoveries and is included for informational purposes.
e These amounts shall be from the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S., and appropriated pursuant to Section 43-4-201 (3)(a)(V), C.R.S.
(C) Tax Conferee
Personal Services 1,760,001 1,662,718 97,283a
(13.6 FTE)
Operating Expenses 60,905 60,905
1,820,906
a This amount shall be transferred from Governor - Lieutenant Governor - State Planning and Budgeting from the Economic Development Commission - General Economic Incentives
and Marketing line item in Economic Development Programs and originated as user fees.
(D) Special Purpose
Cigarette Tax Rebate 6,036,300 6,036,300(I)a
Amendment 35 Distribution
to Local Governments 873,102 873,102b
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1168

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Old Age Heat and Fuel and
Property Tax Assistance 11,128,945 11,128,945(I)c
Commercial Vehicle
Enterprise Sales Tax Refund 120,524 120,524d
Retail Marijuana Sales Tax
Distribution to Local
Governments 18,758,757 18,758,757(I)e
36,917,628
a Pursuant to Section 39-22-623 (1)(a)(II)(B), C.R.S., this amount is included in the general appropriation bill for informational purposes and shall not be deemed to be an appropriation
subject to the limitations of Section 24-75-201.1, C.R.S., or subject to the limitation on state fiscal year spending imposed by Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
b This amount shall be from the Tobacco Tax Cash Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (1)(a), C.R.S., which consists of revenues from additional state cigarette and tobacco taxes imposed
pursuant to Section 21 of Article X of the State Constitution. This amount is thus not subject to the limitation on state fiscal year spending imposed by Section 20 of Article X of the
State Constitution.
c Pursuant to Section 39-31-102 (1)(a), C.R.S., this amount is included in the general appropriation bill for informational purposes and shall not be deemed to be an appropriation subject
to the limitations of Section 24-75-201.1, C.R.S., or subject to the limitation on state fiscal year spending imposed by Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
d This amount shall be from the Commercial Vehicle Enterprise Tax Fund created in Section 42-1-225 (1), C.R.S.
e Pursuant to Section 39-28.8-203 (1)(a)(V), C.R.S., this amount is included in the general appropriation bill for informational purposes and shall not be deemed to be an appropriation
subject to the limitations of Section 24-75-201.1, C.R.S., or subject to the limitations on state fiscal year spending imposed by Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
102,451,552
(3) DIVISION OF MOTOR VEHICLES
(A) Administration
Personal Services 3,928,602 727,147 3,149,669a 51,786b
(40.9 FTE)
Operating Expenses 530,668 63,731 463,547a 3,390b
DRIVES Maintenance and
Support 10,069,326 18,000 10,051,326a
14,528,596
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1168

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of these amounts, an estimated $10,051,326 shall be from the Colorado DRIVES Vehicle Services Account in the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 42-1-211 (2), C.R.S.,
and an estimated $3,613,216 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b These amounts shall be transferred from the Department of Corrections from the Offender ID Program in the Institutions Section.
(B) Driver Services
Personal Services 29,013,349 3,550,791 25,339,576a 122,982b
(426.9 FTE)
Operating Expenses 2,654,959 414,260 2,230,529a 10,170b
2,517,459 276,760
Drivers License Documents 8,143,739 3,498 8,140,241c
Ignition Interlock Program 742,960 742,960d
(6.9 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 3,649,617 3,649,617a
44,204,624
44,067,124
a Of these amounts, an estimated $17,394,480 shall be from the Colorado DRIVES Vehicle Services Account in the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 42-1-211 (2), C.R.S.,
$14,192 shall be from the First Time Drunk Driving Offender Account in the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 42-2-132 (4)(b)(II)(A), C.R.S., and an estimated $13,811,050
shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b These amounts shall be transferred from the Department of Corrections from the Offender ID Program in the Institutions Section.
c This amount shall be from the Colorado DRIVES Vehicle Services Account in the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 42-1-211 (2), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from the First Time Drunk Driving Offender Account in the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 42-2-132 (4)(b)(II)(A), C.R.S.
(C) Vehicle Services
Personal Services 3,736,892 558,687 3,178,205a
(54.9 FTE)
Operating Expenses 408,920 28,587 380,333a
License Plate Ordering 13,715,065 13,715,065b
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1168

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Motorist Insurance
Identification Database
Program 358,928 358,928c
(1.0 FTE)
Emissions Program 1,312,850 1,312,850d
(15.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 583,975 583,975a
20,116,630
a Of these amounts, an estimated $2,433,824 shall be from the Colorado DRIVES Vehicle Services Account in the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 42-1-211 (2), C.R.S.,
$1,507,537 shall be from the Department of Revenue Subaccount in the AIR Account, a subaccount in the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 42-3-304 (18)(c), C.R.S., and
$201,152 shall be from the Electronic Transactions Fund created in Section 42-1-234 (4)(a).
b This amount shall be from the License Plate Cash Fund created in Section 42-3-301 (1)(b), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Colorado DRIVES Vehicle Services Account in the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 42-1-211 (2), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from the Department of Revenue Subaccount in the AIR Account, a subaccount in the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 42-3-304 (18)(c), C.R.S.
(D) County Support Services
Operating Expenses 2,317,295 2,317,295a
County Office Asset
Maintenance 511,430 511,430a
County Office
Improvements 36,000 36,000a
2,864,725
a These amounts shall be from the Colorado DRIVES Vehicle Services Account in the Highway Users Tax Fund created in Section 42-1-211 (2), C.R.S.
81,714,575
81,577,075
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1168

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(4) SPECIALIZED BUSINESS GROUP
(A) Administration
Personal Services 1,213,998 8,427 875,942a 329,629b
(11.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 13,934 111 8,885a 4,938b
1,227,932
a These amounts shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b These amounts shall be from the Limited Gaming Fund created in Section 44-30-701 (1), C.R.S., and shall be transferred from the Limited Gaming Division in this department.
(B) Limited Gaming Division
Personal Services 14,052,041 14,052,041(I)a
(138.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 1,996,196 1,996,196(I)a
Payments to Other State
Agencies 5,030,021 5,030,021(I)b
Distribution to Gaming
Cities and Counties 26,035,153 26,035,153(I)b
Responsible Gaming Grant
Program 4,220,000 4,220,000c
Indirect Cost Assessment 978,858 978,858(I)b
52,312,269
a Of these amounts, $13,424,117 shall be from the Limited Gaming Fund created in Section 44-30-701 (1), C.R.S., and is included for informational purposes pursuant to Section 9
(5)(b)(I) of Article XVIII of the State Constitution and Section 44-30-701 (1)(b)(I), C.R.S., which specify that the State Treasurer is authorized to pay all ongoing expenses of the Limited
Gaming Commission related to the administration of Limited Gaming, and that such payments shall not be conditioned on any appropriation by the General Assembly, and $2,624,120
shall be from the Sports Betting Fund created in Section 44-30-1509 (1)(a), C.R.S., which is continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 44-30-1509 (1)(b), C.R.S., and is included
for informational purposes only.
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1168

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b These amounts shall be from the Limited Gaming Fund created in Section 44-30-701 (1), C.R.S., and are included for informational purposes pursuant to Section 9 (5)(b)(I) of Article
XVIII of the State Constitution and Section 44-30-701 (1)(b)(I), C.R.S., which specify that the State Treasurer is authorized to pay all ongoing expenses of the Limited Gaming
Commission related to the administration of Limited Gaming, and that such payments shall not be conditioned on any appropriation by the General Assembly.
c These amounts shall be from the Responsible Gaming Grant Program Cash Fund created in Section 44-30-1702 (8)(a), C.R.S.
(C) Liquor and Tobacco Enforcement Division
Personal Services 5,480,060 205,030 5,275,030a
(65.4 FTE)
Operating Expenses 539,856 6,965 532,891a
Indirect Cost Assessment 610,487 610,487a
6,630,403
a Of these amounts, $6,068,408 shall be from the Liquor Enforcement Division and State Licensing Authority Cash Fund created in Section 44-6-101, C.R.S., and $350,000 shall be
from the Tobacco Education Programs Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(c)(I), C.R.S., which consists of revenues from additional state cigarette and tobacco taxes imposed pursuant
to Section 21 of Article X of the State Constitution and thus is not subject to the limitation on state fiscal year spending imposed by Article X, Section 20 of the State Constitution and
pursuant to Section 21 (4) of Article X of the State Constitution.
(D) Division of Racing Events
Personal Services 1,480,809 1,480,809a
(11.7 FTE)
Operating Expenses 505,026 505,026a
Purses and Breeders Awards 1,400,000 1,400,000b
Indirect Cost Assessment 108,043 108,043a
3,493,878
a Of these amounts, an estimated $2,017,878 shall be from the Racing Cash Fund created in Section 44-32-205 (1), C.R.S., and $76,000 shall be from the Greyhound Welfare and
Adoption Fund created in Section 44-32-701 (2)(a)(1.5)(B), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from racing tax revenues deposited into the Horse Breeders' and Owners' Awards and Supplemental Purse Fund created in Section 44-32-705 (1), C.R.S.
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1168

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(E) Auto Industry Division
Personal Services 3,201,721 3,201,721a
(32.3 FTE)
Operating Expenses 325,446 325,446a
Indirect Cost Assessment 330,366 330,366a
3,857,533
a These amounts shall be from the Auto Dealers License Fund created in Section 44-20-133 (1), C.R.S.
(F) Marijuana Enforcement
Marijuana Enforcement 16,897,960 16,897,960a
(158.6 FTE)
Natural Medicine 1,584,633 1,584,633b
(19.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 1,493,859 1,493,859a
19,976,452
a Of these amounts, $14,891,819 shall be from the Marijuana Cash Fund created in Section 44-10-801 (1)(a), C.R.S. and $3,500,000 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created
in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Regulated Natural Medicine Division Cash Fund created in C.R.S. 44-50-601 (1)(a), C.R.S.
(G) Firearms Dealers Division
Personal Services 2,008,131 1,800,131 208,000a
(23.7 FTE)
Operating Expenses 239,936 239,936
2,248,067
89,746,534
a These amounts shall be from the Firearm Dealer Permit Cash Fund created in Section 18-12-401.5(2)(d) C.R.S.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1168

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(5) STATE LOTTERY DIVISION
Personal Services 11,033,214 11,033,214a
(115.9 FTE)
Operating Expenses 1,655,676 1,655,676a
Payments to Other State
Agencies 239,410 239,410a
Marketing and
Communications 18,200,000 18,200,000a
Multi-State Lottery Fees 177,433 177,433a
Vendor Fees 52,136,622 52,136,622a
Retailer Compensation 85,000,000 85,000,000a
Indirect Cost Assessment 923,329 923,329a
169,365,684
a These amounts shall be from the Lottery Fund created in Section 44-40-111 (1), C.R.S.
TOTALS PART XX $557,041,568 $154,621,461a $392,122,764b $9,445,211 $852,132c
(REVENUE) $556,500,601 $154,004,166a $392,196,112b $9,448,191
a Of this amount, $35,924,002 contains an (I) notation and is included as information for the purpose of complying with the limitation on state fiscal year spending imposed by Section
20 of Article X of the State Constitution. These amounts are continuously appropriated by a permanent statute, and shall not be deemed to be an appropriation subject to the limitations
of Section 24-75-201.1, C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $48,102,988 contains an (I) notation.
c This amount contains an (I) notation.
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1168

SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1168